lexicon.lexc
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3PlObvObj:imind EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3PlProxObj:indwaa EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3SgObvObj:imind EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+3SgProxObj:ind EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+ExclObj:igooyaang EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+InclObj:igooyang EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj+InclObj:igooying EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+1SgObj:igoyaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+2PlObj:igoyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+2SgObj:igoyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3PlObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3SgObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+ExclObj:igoyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj+InclObj:igoyangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+1SgObj:igoyaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+2PlObj:igoyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+2SgObj:igoyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3PlObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3SgObvObj:igonipan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+ExclObj:igoyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj+InclObj:igoyangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+2PlObj:inagoogoban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+2SgObj:inaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3PlObvObj:imagiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3PlProxObj:agwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3SgObvObj:imagiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj+3SgProxObj:agiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+1SgObj:i1yegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3PlObvObj:imegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3PlProxObj:egwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3SgObvObj:imegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+3SgProxObj:egiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj+ExclObj:i1yaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+1SgObj:i1yamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3PlObvObj:imadiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3PlProxObj:adwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3SgObvObj:imadiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+3SgProxObj:adiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj+ExclObj:i1yaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+1SgObj:i1waapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+2SgObj:inegwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3PlObvObj:aawaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3SgObvObj:aawaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+ExclObj:i1yangidwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+ExclObj:igooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+InclObj:inangwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj+3PlProxObj:igowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj+3SgProxObj:igopan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+1SgObj:i1pan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+2PlObj:igooyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+2SgObj:inegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+3PlObvObj:aapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+3SgObvObj:aapan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+ExclObj:i1yangidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+ExclObj:igooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj+InclObj:inangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+2PlObj:igooyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+2SgObj:igooyaniban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3PlObvObj:imangidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3PlProxObj:angidwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3SgObvObj:imangidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+3SgProxObj:angidiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3PlObvObj:imangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3PlProxObj:angwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3SgObvObj:imangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj+3SgProxObj:angiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+1SgObj:igooyaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+2PlObj:igooyegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+2SgObj:igooyamban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3PlObvObj:imindiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3PlProxObj:indwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3SgObvObj:imindiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+3SgProxObj:indiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+ExclObj:igooyaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj+InclObj:igooyangiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_aw                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary
+VTA+Recip/di:0%>%>di VAI_Class=VAI_rcp_Boundary ;
+VTA+Reflex/dizo:0%>%>dizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
0:%>%> VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_aw                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_aw                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VTA, Class: VTA_aw, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_Stems
aaboozikaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
aakoziishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
aanwetaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
aasonamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
aawenaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
aayaanikeshkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
aazhawaatebii'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
abaagamizamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
adaawaagetamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
agaamindekaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
agokiwasamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
agwa'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
agwaawebinamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
amanisodaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
andodamaw:nandodamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
andoojiishkaw:nandoojiishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
anibewebishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
animikwiitaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
anokiitaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
apagidaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
asemaakaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
ataw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
ayadaawetamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
ayagoodaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
ayindazhiikaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
azhenamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
azhewebishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
baabiidaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
baakaakowebinamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
baapinodaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
baasikaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
baazhijigwaashkwanodaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
babagidinamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
bagakitaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
bakenizhikaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
bakizhamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
bakwajibidamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
bakwezhamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
bapasininjii'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
basinaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
bezhigookaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
biidaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
biindigaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
biinjitawageshkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
biitoozhamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
binishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
bizikaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
boonitaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
daangaawiganeshkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
dangishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
dazhwegishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
dibaajimotaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
gaadamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
gaandakii'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
gaasiibii'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
gaganawendamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
gashkaakwa'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
geshawishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
gigishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
giishkizhamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
giiwewidamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
giizhooshkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
gimooji-wanii'igaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
giziisaginamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
gwaaba'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
ikosidamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
inagindamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
inizhamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
izhibii'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
izhitamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
jaaginamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
maagonamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
maajinizhikaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
madaabiinizhikaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
mamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
mashkawinamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
megwaashkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
mikamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
mino-doodaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
mooshkinebii'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
naabishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
naajigaabawitaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
naanigibidamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
naazitaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
nagishkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
nanaa'itaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
nanisidawinaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
niibawitaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
niiskaabidetaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
nishkinaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
noondaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
okosidamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
oninamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
oshaakaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
ozhitaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
waawiindamaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
wawiyazhinaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
wiidookaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
wiimaashkaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
zaagijinizhikaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
zaga'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
zaswebiiga'andaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
zhakamodaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
zhiibiniketaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
zhizhoobii'amaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
ziiwiskaabitaw VTA_Class=VTA_aw_Boundary ;
